Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Article 7. Insured Loans.

§ 43-33-301.
Loans authorized.

Banks, savings banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations and credit unions which are subject to the laws of the State of Mississippi or of the United States of America, and mortgagees approved by the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, or Farmers Home Administration which are qualified by requirements of the United States or a political subdivision thereof to so act, are hereby authorized to make loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit which are insured, guaranteed in whole or in part, or eligible for purchase in whole or in part by the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, Farmers Home Administration, Federal National Mortgage Association, Government National Mortgage Association, Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation, and any successors thereof to obtain such insurance or guarantee or to sell and transfer to such agencies such loans, advances of credit, and obligations.

Banks, savings banks, trust companies, insurance companies, savings and loan associations, credit unions, pension funds, and mortgagees approved by the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, or Farmers Home Administration which are subject to the laws of the State of Mississippi or of the United States of America and have met the requirements thereof, are hereby authorized to make such loans and advances of credit and purchases of obligations representing loans and advances of credit as are enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, which are secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on real estate or a leasehold interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7291; Laws, 1936, chs. 171, 172, § 1; Laws, 1938, ch. 358, § 1; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 34, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 503, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 43-33-303.
Investments authorized.

Any bank, savings bank, trust company, insurance company, savings and loan association, credit union, pension fund, any trustee or other fiduciary or mortgagee approved by the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, or Farmers Home Administration, are hereby authorized to invest their funds and money in their custody or possession eligible for investments in notes or bonds secured by mortgage or deed of trust on real estate or a leasehold interest insured or guaranteed in whole or in part or eligible for purchase in whole or in part by the Federal Housing Administration, Veterans Administration, Farmers Home Administration, Federal National Mortgage Association, Government National Mortgage Association, Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation and any successors thereof to also invest such funds in debentures or other evidences of indebtedness issued by the agencies last enumerated. However, this section shall not authorize fiduciaries to make such investments without the consent of any court where such consent is now required by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7292; Laws, 1936, chs. 171, 172, § 2; Laws, 1938, ch. 358, § 2; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 34, § 2; Laws, 1973, ch. 503, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 17, 1973).

§ 43-33-305.
Securities for public funds.

Such notes, bonds, debentures, including obligations of the Federal National Mortgage Association and the Government National Mortgage Association or their successors, are hereby made eligible to be used as security for public funds in any depository selected and qualifying as a depository for public funds, and may be used as security or for deposit where any kind of bonds or other securities are required or may by law be deposited or accepted as security, including the deposit with the state treasurer by insurance companies for the security and benefit of policyholders. However, notes and other securities as are insured by the Federal Housing Administrator under Title I of the National Housing Act, as amended, are excepted from this provision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7293; Laws, 1936, chs. 171, 172, § 3; Laws, 1938, ch. 358, § 3; Laws, 1969, Ex Sess, ch. 34, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved October 7, 1969).

§ 43-33-307.
Article cumulative.

This article is to be construed as power additional and not in derogation of existing laws. Therefore, no law of this state requiring security upon which loans or investments may be made, or prescribing the nature, amount or form of such security, or prescribing or limiting interest rates upon loans or investments, or limiting investments of capital or deposits, or prescribing or limiting the period for which loans or investments may be made, shall be deemed to apply to loans or investments made pursuant to Sections 43-33-301 through 43-33-305.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7294; Laws, 1936, chs. 171, 172, § 4; Laws, 1938, ch. 358, § 4.